Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 6
PURCHASE BY VETERANS

36-6-101 and 36-6-102. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article repealed, p. 564, § 26, effective April 24.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 2 of chapter 112, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.